Virginia statutes. Title 52. Police (State).
Chapter 13. Gaming Enforcement.

History.

2022, c. 721.

§ 52-53.
Definitions.

As used in this chapter, unless the context requires a different meaning:

“Coordinator”
means the position of the Gaming Enforcement Coordinator established pursuant to §

52-54

.

“Department”
means the Department of State Police.

“Gaming laws”
means the laws regulating gambling under Article 1 (§

18.2-325

et seq.) of Chapter 8 of Title 18.2, charitable gaming under Article 1.1:1 (§

18.2-340.15

et seq.) of Chapter 8 of Title 18.2, lottery games under Article 1 (§

58.1-4000

et seq.) of Chapter 40 of Title 58.1, sports betting under Article 2 (§

58.1-4030

et seq.) of Chapter 40 of Title 58.1, casino gaming under Chapter 41 (§

58.1-4100

et seq.) of Title 58.1, fantasy contests under Chapter 51 (§ 59.1-556 et seq.) of Title 59.1, horse racing and pari-mutuel wagering under Chapter 29 (§ 59.1-364 et seq.) of Title 59.1, any regulations promulgated pursuant to such laws, and any other federal, state, or local laws the Gaming Enforcement Coordinator deems relevant.

“Superintendent”
means the Superintendent of State Police.

History.

2022, cc. 768, 721.

§ 52-54.
Office of the Gaming Enforcement Coordinator established; purpose; duties.

The Superintendent shall designate a Department employee to serve as the Gaming Enforcement Coordinator. The purpose of the office of the Coordinator shall be to synchronize the enforcement of gaming laws by state and local law enforcement, and to serve as a liaison between such agencies and federal law enforcement.

The Coordinator shall have the following duties:

Coordinating enforcement of the Commonwealth’s gaming laws by the Department, the Department of Agriculture and Consumer Services, and all other state agencies; attorneys for the Commonwealth; and local law enforcement;

Acting as a liaison between the federal government and the agencies identified in subdivision 1 for purposes of any federal investigation into gaming activities;

Establishing, advertising, and administering a tip line, which may be accessed by phone and by Internet, for members of the public to report concerns about, or suspected instances of, gaming activities; and

Performing any other duties as are necessary to promote and enable the equitable enforcement of gaming laws in the Commonwealth.

History.

2022, cc. 768, 721.